Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 2

Orthopedic Physician Assistants

63-19-201. Jurisdiction — Duties of the committee.

Licensed orthopedic physician assistants shall be under the jurisdiction of the committee on physician assistants created by § 63-19-103 and the board of medical examiners.

The committee on physician assistants has the duty to:

Promulgate, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, all rules that are reasonably necessary for the performance of the duties of orthopedic physician assistants, including, but not limited to, rules that specify the acts and offenses that subject the license holder to disciplinary action by the committee pursuant to subdivision (b)(7);

Set fees relative to the examination, licensure and licensure renewal of orthopedic physician assistants in an amount sufficient to pay all of the expenses of the committee, as well as all of the expenses of the board that are directly attributable to the performance of its duties pursuant to this part and to establish and collect a late renewal fee from those orthopedic physician assistants who fail to renew their licenses in a timely manner;

Review and approve or reject the qualifications of each applicant for initial licensure as an orthopedic physician assistant;

Biennially review and approve or reject the qualifications of each applicant for biennial licensure renewal. The committee shall condition approval for renewal on the receipt of evidence satisfactory to the committee of the applicant's successful completion of sixty (60) hours of continuing medical education approved by the American Medical Association or other appropriate professional association. The committee may, in its discretion, waive or modify the continuing medical education requirement in cases of retirement, illness, disability or other undue hardship;

Issue, in the board's name, all approved orthopedic physician assistant licenses and renewals;

Collect or receive all fees, fines and moneys owed pursuant to this part and pay the fees, fines and moneys into the general fund of the state. For the purpose of implementing subdivision (b)(2), all fees, fines and moneys collected pursuant to the regulation of orthopedic physician assistants shall be so designated; and

Deny, suspend or revoke the license of, or otherwise discipline by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), or by reprimand, a license holder who is guilty of violating any provisions of this part or who is guilty of violating the rules of the board promulgated pursuant to subdivision (b)(1). When sanctions are imposed on a licensee pursuant to this subdivision (b)(7), the licensee may, in addition, be required to pay the actual and reasonable costs of the investigation and prosecution of the case, including the costs incurred and assessed for the time of the prosecuting attorney or attorneys, the investigator or investigators and any other persons involved in the investigation, prosecution and hearing of the case. The committee may limit, restrict or impose one (1) or more conditions on a license at the time it is issued, renewed or reinstated or as a sanction imposed at the conclusion of a disciplinary hearing.

The governor shall appoint one (1) certified orthopedic physician assistant to serve as a voting member of the committee on physician assistants with regard to all matters that pertain to orthopedic physician assistants. Each person appointed to this seat on the committee shall serve a term of four (4) years and shall be eligible for reappointment. A vacancy in this position shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term.

Any actions taken under this section shall only be effective after adoption by majority vote of the members of the committee on physician assistants and after adoption by a majority vote of the members of the board of medical examiners at the next board meeting at which administrative matters are considered following the adoption by the committee.

For the purposes of this part, unless the context requires otherwise, “physician” means a person lawfully licensed to practice orthopedic medicine and surgery pursuant to chapter 6 of this title, osteopathic medicine pursuant to chapter 9 of this title, or podiatry pursuant to chapter 3 of this title.

Acts 1995, ch. 337, § 3; 1997, ch. 207, §§ 5, 7, 8; 2016, ch. 946, § 6.

63-19-202. Licensure requirement.

No person shall claim to be or function as an orthopedic physician assistant unless such person holds a valid orthopedic physician assistant license issued by the board.

The board shall license no person as an orthopedic physician assistant unless:

The person is a graduate of an orthopedic physician assistant training program deemed adequate by the committee on physician assistants and the board of medical examiners; and

The person has successfully completed the examination of the National Board for Certification of Orthopedic Physician Assistants; or

Alternatively to the requirements of subdivisions (b)(1) and (2), the person may be licensed as an orthopedic physician assistant if the person has successfully completed the examination of the National Board for Certification of Orthopedic Physician Assistants and was performing services as an orthopedic physician assistant in this state on May 30, 1995.

The board or the committee may require that an applicant for licensure as an orthopedic physician assistant appear before the board or the committee to answer any questions regarding the applicant's fitness for licensure.

Acts 1995, ch. 337, § 4; 1997, ch. 207, § 5.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality and construction of subdivision (b)(3)'s alternative licensure provision, OAG 98-059 (3/9/98).

63-19-203. Collaboration with orthopedic physician assistant.

A licensed orthopedic physician assistant is authorized to perform services only in collaboration with a licensed orthopedic physician or surgeon within the specialty of orthopedic medicine and surgery, or in collaboration with a licensed podiatrist.

Collaboration between a collaborating physician and a licensed orthopedic physician assistant shall require active and continuous overview by the collaborating physician to ensure that the physician's directions, orders, and advice are in fact being implemented, but does not require the constant physical presence of the collaborating physician. The collaborating physician shall, however, make a personal review of historical, physical, and therapeutic data on all patients and their condition and so certify by personal signature in a timely manner.

An orthopedic physician assistant collaborating with a licensed podiatrist:

Shall not provide services that are outside of the scope of practice of a podiatrist as set forth in § 63-3-101; and

Shall comply with the requirements of and any rules adopted pursuant to §§ 63-19-203 — 63-19-205 governing collaboration with a physician assistant.

Acts 1995, ch. 337, § 5; 1997, ch. 207, § 5; 2016, ch. 946, §§ 7, 8; 2018, ch. 610, §§ 25-28.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “in collaboration with” for “under the supervision of” twice in (a); in (b), substituted “Collaboration between a collaborating physician and a” for “Supervision of the” at the beginning and substituted “collaborating” for “supervising” throughout; in (c), substituted “collaborating with” for “supervised by” in the introductory language and substituted “collaboration with” for “the supervision of” in (2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 610, § 42. July 1, 2018.

63-19-204. Standard of care.

The licensed orthopedic physician assistant shall function in accordance with written policies and procedures involving management of care that have been established by the collaborating physician and the orthopedic physician assistant.

With respect to follow-up care rendered in a clinic, hospital, nursing home or patient's home and in similar situations where a therapeutic regimen, policy or protocol has been established by the collaborating physician, the licensed orthopedic physician assistant may check and record the patient's progress within the confines of the written regimen, policy or protocol and report the patient's progress and changes to the physician after each visit. When a new problem arises, the collaborating physician shall undertake personal review of the patient's problem or complaint.

The orthopedic physician assistant may render emergency services in accordance with guidelines previously established by the collaborating physician, pending the arrival of a responsible physician in cases where immediate diagnosis and treatment are necessary to avoid disability or death.

Acts 1995, ch. 337, § 6; 1997, ch. 207, § 5; 2018, ch. 610, § 29.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “collaborating physician” for “supervising physician” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 610, § 42. July 1, 2018.

63-19-205. Practices of collaborating physician.

A licensed physician who is collaborating with orthopedic physician assistants shall comply with the following practices:

No one (1) collaborating physician shall collaborate with more than two (2) licensed orthopedic physician assistants at any one time;

More than one (1) physician may collaborate with the same licensed orthopedic physician assistant;

The collaborating physician shall designate one (1) or more alternate physicians who have agreed to accept the responsibility of collaborating with the orthopedic physician assistant on a prearranged basis in the absence of the collaborating physician;

The licensed orthopedic physician assistant shall render services and care commensurate with such orthopedic assistant's education, training and experience;

The licensed orthopedic physician assistant shall not make any definitive diagnosis or prescribe any treatment program independent of the collaborating physician;

Pre-signed prescriptions shall not be used by the licensed orthopedic physician assistant. Medications dispensed by the licensed orthopedic physician assistant shall be approved by the collaborating physician; and

The patient of any physician receiving services from a licensed orthopedic physician assistant shall be fully informed that the individual is a licensed orthopedic physician assistant and/or a sign shall be conspicuously placed within the office of the physician indicating that certain services may be rendered by a licensed orthopedic physician assistant.

Acts 1995, ch. 337, § 7; 1997, ch. 207, § 5; 2016, ch. 946, § 9; 2018, ch. 610, §§ 30-32.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “collaborating physician” for “supervising physician”, “collaborating with” for “supervising” and “collaborate with” for “supervise” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 610, § 42. July 1, 2018.

63-19-206. Unauthorized practice.

Any licensed orthopedic physician assistant rendering services inconsistent with this part shall be considered to be practicing medicine without a license and shall be subject to appropriate legal action by the board of medical examiners.

Acts 1995, ch. 337, § 8; 1997, ch. 207, § 5.

63-19-207. Unauthorized utilization of services.

When a licensed orthopedic physician or surgeon utilizes the services of a licensed orthopedic physician assistant inconsistent with this part, it shall constitute grounds for a finding of unprofessional conduct, and the physician shall be subject to disciplinary action by the board of medical examiners. Such disciplinary action may include, but is not limited to, the suspension of privileges to utilize a licensed orthopedic physician assistant or the revocation or suspension of the license of the orthopedic physician or surgeon.

Acts 1995, ch. 337, § 9; 1997, ch. 207, § 5.

63-19-208. Scope.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to modify or supersede any existing laws or rules pertaining to any other allied health professionals, professions, or services.

Nothing in this part shall permit a licensed orthopedic physician assistant to:

Practice chiropractic or analyze or palpate the articulations of the spinal column for the purposes of giving a spinal adjustment; or

Measure the powers or range of human vision, or determine the refractive state of the human eye or the scope of its functions in general, or prescribe or direct the use of opthalmic lenses or prisms to remedy or relieve defects of vision or muscular anomalies or prescribe or fit or adapt contact lenses to or for the human eye.

This part does not apply to other physician extenders, physician assistants, family nurse practitioners, registered nurses, licensed practical nurses, technologists, technicians and other assistants or employees that perform delegated services in a medical setting.

Acts 1995, ch. 337, § 10; 1997, ch. 207, § 5.

63-19-209. Retired orthopedic physician assistant.

Any person licensed by the board as an orthopedic physician assistant who has retired from such practice in this state shall not be required to biennially renew such person's license as required by this part, if such person files an affidavit on a form furnished by the board. Such affidavit shall state the date on which the person retired from practice and any other information deemed necessary by the board. If such person decides to reengage in practice in this state, such person shall apply for licensure as provided by this part and shall not be liable for payment of licensure renewal fees that accrued during the period of retirement.

Acts 1995, ch. 337, § 11; 1997, ch. 207, § 5.

63-19-210. Correct title.

Any person who holds a valid license from the board of medical examiners under this part may use the title “orthopedic physician assistant” or the abbreviation “OPA-C” or “OPA,” but such person shall not use the title “physician assistant” or the abbreviation “PA” or “PA-C.”

Acts 1995, ch. 337, § 12; 1996, ch. 771, § 6; 1997, ch. 207, § 5.

63-19-113. Licensure renewal by retired physician assistants.